Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201471-6502
In-home personal
services worker; qualifications.

An in-home personal
services worker:

(1) Shall be at least eighteen years of age;

(2) Shall have good moral character;

(3) Shall not have been convicted of a crime under the laws
of Nebraska or another jurisdiction, the penalty for which is imprisonment
for a period of more than one year and which crime is rationally related to
the person's fitness or capacity to act as an in-home personal services worker;

(4) Shall have no adverse findings on the Adult Protective
Services Central Registry, the central registry created in section
28-718, the Medication Aide Registry, the Nurse Aide Registry, or the central
registry maintained by the sex offender registration and community notification
division of the Nebraska State Patrol pursuant to section 29-4004;

(5) Shall be able to speak and understand the English language
or the language of the person for whom he or she is providing in-home personal
services; and

(6) Shall have training sufficient to provide the requisite
level of in-home personal services offered.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 40;

Laws 2014, LB853, § 49.
July 18, 2014
Adult Protective Services Act, see section 28-348.

Medication Aide Act, see section 71-6718.